Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2401.01
Restricted parking lots; unauthorized
parking; towing; violation; penalty.

Except in cities of
the metropolitan or primary class, any person parking a vehicle in a properly posted, restricted
parking lot without the consent of the owner or tenant authorized to give
permission shall be guilty of an infraction and the vehicle shall be subject
to being towed away at the request of such lot owner or tenant. Any person
found guilty under this section shall be subject to the penalties provided
in section 29-436 for infractions. If the identity of the operator of a vehicle in violation
of this section cannot be determined, the owner or person in whose name such
vehicle is registered shall be held prima facie responsible for such infraction.
When any law enforcement officer observes or is advised that a vehicle may be in violation
of this section, he or she shall make a determination as to whether a violation
has in fact occurred and, if
so, shall personally
serve or attach to such vehicle
a citation pursuant to section 29-424, directed to the owner or operator
of such vehicle, which shall set forth the nature of the violation. Any person
who refuses to sign the citation or otherwise comply with the command of the
citation shall be punished as provided by section 29-426. As used in this
section, law enforcement officer shall include any authorized representative
of a law enforcement agency.

Laws 1981, LB 47, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB1065, § 2.